District of Columbia statutes.
26-714

Enforcement.

Any order issued pursuant to this subchapter may be enforced in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 10e
as added Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-42, § 2(d), 38 DCR 4981
1981 Ed., § 26-813.
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 11-142 as subchapter II of Chapter 8 [subchapter II of Chapter 7, 2001 Ed.], and the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in this section.